Hawaii statutes.
§206-30 Provisions of bonds. In
connection with the issuance of bonds or the incurring of any obligation and to
secure the payment of the bonds or obligations, the board of land and natural
resources in addition to its other powers may:

(1) Pledge all or any part of its revenues under this
chapter to which its right then exists or may thereafter come into existence;

(2) Covenant against mortgaging all or any part of
its property, real or personal, then owned or thereafter acquired, in
connection with development projects or against permitting or suffering any
lien thereon;

(3) Covenant with respect to limitations on its right
to sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of any project or any part thereof;

(4) Covenant against pledging all or any part of its
revenues from any development project to which its right then exists or may
thereafter come into existence, or against permitting or suffering any lien
thereon;

(5) Covenant as to the bonds to be issued and as to
the issuance of the bonds in escrow or otherwise, and as to the use and
disposition of the proceeds thereof;

(6) Covenant as to what other, or additional debts
may be incurred by it in the exercise of its authority under this chapter;

(7) Provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed,
or mutilated bonds;

(8) Covenant that the board warrants title;

(9) Covenant as to the amount to be raised each year
or other period of time by revenues under this chapter and as to the use and
disposition to be made thereof;

(10) Covenant as to the use of any or all of its
property, real or personal, acquired or held for use in connection with
development projects under this chapter;

(11) Create or authorize the creation of special funds
segregating the proceeds of any loans or grants, the revenue of any project or
projects, reserves for principal and interest on its bonds and for operating
contingencies and other reserves; and covenant as to the use and disposal of
the moneys held in the funds;

(12) Redeem the bonds and covenant for their
redemption and provide the terms and conditions thereof;

(13) Covenant against extending the time for the
payment of its bonds or interest thereon;

(14) Prescribe the procedure, if any, by which the
terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount
of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto and the manner in which the
consent may be given;

(15) Covenant as to the maintenance of its property
acquired or held for use in connection with development projects under this
chapter, and replacement thereof, the insurance to be carried thereon, and the
use and disposition of insurance moneys;

(16) Vest in an obligee, in the event of a default by
the board, the right to cure any such default and to advance any moneys
necessary for the purpose and covenant that the moneys so advanced be an
additional obligation of the board with such interest, security, and priority
as may be provided in any lease or contract;

(17) Covenant and prescribe as to the events of
default and terms and conditions upon which any or all of its bonds shall
become or may be declared due before maturity and as to the terms and
conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived;

(18) Covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers,
and duties arising upon the breach by it of any covenant, condition, or
obligation;

(19) Covenant to surrender possession of a project or
projects or parts thereof upon the happening of an event of default; and vest
in any obligee the right, upon a default and without judicial proceedings, to
take possession and use, operate, manage, and control the projects or any parts
thereof and to collect and receive revenues arising therefrom in the same
manner as the board itself might do and to dispose of the moneys collected in
accordance with the agreement of the obligee with the board;

(20) Vest in a trustee the right to enforce any
covenant to secure, or pay the bonds, or otherwise relating to the bonds;
provide for the powers and duties of the trustee, limit the liabilities
thereof, and provide the terms and conditions upon which the trustee or the
holders of bonds, or any proportion of them may enforce any such covenant;

(21) Make covenants other than, and in addition to,
the covenants herein expressly authorized, of like or different character; and
execute all instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers
herein granted, or in the performance of its covenants or duties, which may
contain such covenants and provisions, in addition to those above specified, as
the government or any purchaser of the bonds of the board may require;

(22) Make such covenants and do any and all such acts
and things as may be necessary, convenient, or desirable to secure its bonds,
or, in the absolute discretion of the board, tend to make the bonds more
marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants, acts or things may not be
enumerated herein. [L 1961, c 6, §28; Supp, §98J-28; HRS §206-30]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next